Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 TLSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 ALL-TERRAIN VEHICLE REGISTRATION FOR HIGHWAY USE 2 Section 1. Section 321.2, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 2. The division of state patrol of the department of public 5 safety shall enforce the provisions of this chapter relating to 6 traffic on the public highways of the state, including those 7 relating to the safe and legal operation of passenger cars, 8 motorcycles, all-terrain vehicles, motor trucks, buses, and 9 other commercial motor vehicles, and to see that proper safety 10 rules are observed. 11 Sec. 2. Section 321.20B, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 8A. This section does not apply to an 14 all-terrain vehicle operated on a highway incidental to the 15 vehicleâs use for agricultural purposes pursuant to section 16 321.234A, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . 17 Sec. 3. Section 321.34, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2026, are 18 amended to read as follows: 19 1. Plates issued. The county treasurer upon receiving 20 application, accompanied by proper fee, for registration of a 21 vehicle shall issue to the owner one registration plate for a 22 motorcycle, motorized bicycle, all-terrain vehicle, autocycle, 23 truck tractor, trailer, or semitrailer and two registration 24 plates for every other motor vehicle. The registration plates, 25 including special registration plates, shall be assigned 26 to the owner of a vehicle. When the owner of a registered 27 vehicle transfers or assigns ownership of the vehicle to 28 another person, the owner shall remove the registration plates 29 from the vehicle. The owner shall forward the plates to any 30 county treasurer or the owner may have the plates assigned to 31 another vehicle within thirty days after transfer, upon payment 32 of the fees required by law. The owner shall immediately 33 affix registration plates retained by the owner to another 34 vehicle owned or acquired by the owner, providing the owner 35 -1- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 1/ 33 H.F. _____ complies with section 321.46 . The department shall adopt rules 1 providing for the assignment of registration plates to the 2 transferee of a vehicle for which a credit is allowed under 3 section 321.46, subsection 6 . 4 3. Radio operators plates. The owner of an automobile, 5 motorcycle, all-terrain vehicle, trailer, or motor truck 6 who holds an amateur radio license issued by the federal 7 communications commission may, upon written application to 8 the county treasurer accompanied by a fee of five dollars, 9 order special registration plates bearing the call letters 10 authorized the radio station covered by the personâs amateur 11 radio license. When received by the county treasurer, such 12 special registration plates shall be issued to the applicant 13 in exchange for the registration plates previously issued to 14 the person. Not more than one set of special registration 15 plates may be issued to an applicant. Said fee shall be in 16 addition to and not in lieu of the fee for regular registration 17 plates. Special registration plates must be surrendered upon 18 expiration of the ownerâs amateur radio license and the owner 19 shall thereupon be entitled to the ownerâs regular registration 20 plates. The county treasurer shall validate special plates in 21 the same manner as regular registration plates, upon payment 22 of five dollars in addition to the regular annual registration 23 fee. 24 Sec. 4. Section 321.34, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 25 2026, is amended to read as follows: 26 a. Upon application and the payment of a fee of twenty-five 27 dollars, the director may issue to the owner of a motor 28 vehicle registered in this state or a trailer or travel trailer 29 registered in this state, personalized registration plates 30 marked with up to seven initials, letters, or combination 31 of numerals and letters requested by the owner. However, 32 personalized registration plates for all-terrain vehicles, 33 autocycles, motorcycles, and motorized bicycles shall be marked 34 with no more than six initials, letters, or combinations 35 -2- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 2/ 33 H.F. _____ of numerals and letters. Upon receipt of the personalized 1 registration plates, the applicant shall surrender the regular 2 registration plates to the county treasurer. The fee for 3 issuance of the personalized registration plates shall be in 4 addition to the regular annual registration fee. 5 Sec. 5. Section 321.34, subsection 8, paragraph a, Code 6 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 a. The owner of a motor vehicle subject to registration 8 under section 321.109, subsection 1 , all-terrain vehicle, 9 autocycle, motorcycle, trailer, or motor truck who has been 10 awarded the medal of honor may, upon written application to 11 the department, order special registration plates which shall 12 be red, white, and blue in color and shall bear an emblem of 13 the medal of honor and an identifying number. Each applicant 14 applying for special registration plates under this subsection 15 may order only one set of registration plates under this 16 subsection . The application is subject to approval by the 17 department and the special registration plates shall be issued 18 at no charge to the applicant in exchange for the registration 19 plates previously issued to the person. A person who is issued 20 special plates under this subsection is exempt from payment 21 of any annual registration fee for the motor vehicle bearing 22 the special plates. The department shall validate the special 23 plates in the same manner as regular registration plates are 24 validated under this section . The department shall not issue 25 special registration plates until service organizations in the 26 state have furnished the department either the special dies or 27 the cost of the special dies necessary for the manufacture of 28 the special registration plate. 29 Sec. 6. Section 321.34, subsection 8A, paragraph a, Code 30 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 a. The owner of a motor vehicle subject to registration 32 under section 321.109, subsection 1 , all-terrain vehicle, 33 autocycle, motorcycle, trailer, or motor truck who was a 34 prisoner of war during a time of military conflict may, 35 -3- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 3/ 33 H.F. _____ upon written application to the department, order only one 1 set of special registration plates with an ex-prisoner of 2 war processed emblem. The emblem shall be designed by the 3 department in cooperation with the adjutant general and shall 4 signify that the owner was a prisoner of war as described in 5 this subsection . The application is subject to approval by the 6 department, in consultation with the adjutant general. The 7 special plates shall be issued at no charge and are subject 8 to an annual registration fee of fifteen dollars. The county 9 treasurer shall validate the special plates in the same 10 manner as regular registration plates are validated under this 11 section . 12 Sec. 7. Section 321.34, subsection 10, paragraph a, Code 13 2026, is amended to read as follows: 14 a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, the 15 director may issue fire fighter plates to the owner of a 16 motor vehicle subject to registration under section 321.109, 17 subsection 1 , all-terrain vehicle, autocycle, motor truck, 18 motor home, multipurpose vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, 19 or travel trailer if the owner is a current or retired 20 member of a paid or volunteer fire department. The special 21 registration plates, designed by the department in cooperation 22 with representatives designated by the Iowa fire fightersâ 23 associations, signify that the applicant is a current or 24 retired member of a paid or volunteer fire department. 25 Sec. 8. Section 321.34, subsection 11, paragraph a, Code 26 2026, is amended to read as follows: 27 a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, the 28 director may issue natural resources plates to the owner of a 29 motor vehicle subject to registration under section 321.109, 30 subsection 1 , all-terrain vehicle, autocycle, motor truck, 31 motor home, multipurpose vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or 32 travel trailer. 33 Sec. 9. Section 321.34, subsection 11A, paragraph a, Code 34 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 -4- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 4/ 33 H.F. _____ a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, the 1 director may issue âlove our kidsâ plates to the owner of a 2 motor vehicle subject to registration under section 321.109, 3 subsection 1 , all-terrain vehicle, autocycle, motor truck, 4 motor home, multipurpose vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or 5 travel trailer. 6 Sec. 10. Section 321.34, subsection 11B, paragraph a, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, the 9 director may issue âmotorcycle rider educationâ plates to the 10 owner of a motor vehicle subject to registration under section 11 321.109, subsection 1 , all-terrain vehicle, autocycle, motor 12 truck, motor home, multipurpose vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, 13 or travel trailer. 14 Sec. 11. Section 321.34, subsection 11C, paragraph a, Code 15 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, 17 the director may issue blackout plates to the owner of a 18 motor vehicle subject to registration under section 321.109, 19 subsection 1 , all-terrain vehicle, autocycle, motor truck, 20 motor home, multipurpose vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or 21 travel trailer. 22 Sec. 12. Section 321.34, subsection 11D, paragraph a, Code 23 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, the 25 director may issue flying our colors plates to the owner of a 26 motor vehicle subject to registration under section 321.109, 27 subsection 1 , all-terrain vehicle, autocycle, motor truck, 28 motor home, multipurpose vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or 29 travel trailer. 30 Sec. 13. Section 321.34, subsection 12, paragraphs a and d, 31 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 32 a. The owner of a motor vehicle subject to registration 33 pursuant to section 321.109, subsection 1 , all-terrain vehicle, 34 autocycle, motor truck, motor home, multipurpose vehicle, 35 -5- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 5/ 33 H.F. _____ motorcycle, trailer, or travel trailer may, upon written 1 application to the department, order special registration 2 plates with a distinguishing processed emblem as authorized by 3 this section or as approved by the department. The fee for the 4 issuance of special registration plates is twenty-five dollars 5 for each vehicle, unless otherwise provided by this section , 6 which fee is in addition to the regular annual registration 7 fee. The county treasurer shall validate special registration 8 plates with a distinguishing processed emblem in the same 9 manner as regular registration plates, upon payment of five 10 dollars in addition to the regular annual registration fee. 11 d. A special registration plate issued for a motorcycle, 12 all-terrain vehicle, autocycle, or motorized bicycle under 13 this section shall be designated in the manner provided for 14 personalized registration plates under subsection 5 , paragraph 15 âaâ . 16 Sec. 14. Section 321.34, subsection 13, paragraph a, 17 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 (1) The owner of a motor vehicle subject to registration 19 pursuant to section 321.109, subsection 1 , all-terrain vehicle, 20 autocycle, motor truck, motor home, multipurpose vehicle, 21 motorcycle, trailer, or travel trailer may upon request 22 be issued special registration plates that contain a space 23 reserved for the placement of an organization decal. If the 24 special plates are requested at the time of initial application 25 for registration and certificate of title for the vehicle, no 26 special plate fee is required other than the regular annual 27 registration fee for the vehicle. If the special plates are 28 requested as replacement plates, the owner shall surrender the 29 current regular or special registration plates in exchange 30 for the special plates and shall pay a replacement plate fee 31 of five dollars. The county treasurer shall validate special 32 plates with an organization decal in the same manner as regular 33 plates, upon payment of the annual registration fee. 34 Sec. 15. Section 321.34, subsection 15, paragraph a, Code 35 -6- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 6/ 33 H.F. _____ 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1 a. The An owner of a motor vehicle subject to registration 2 under section 321.109, subsection 1 , autocycle, motorcycle, 3 trailer, or motor truck referred to in subsection 12 who has 4 been awarded the legion of merit shall be issued one set of 5 special registration plates with a legion of merit processed 6 emblem, upon written application to the department and 7 presentation of satisfactory proof of the award of the legion 8 of merit as established by the Congress of the United States. 9 The emblem shall be designed by the department in cooperation 10 with the adjutant general and shall signify that the owner was 11 awarded the legion of merit. The application is subject to 12 approval by the department, in consultation with the adjutant 13 general. The special plates shall be issued at no charge and 14 are subject to an annual registration fee of fifteen dollars. 15 The county treasurer shall validate the special plates in the 16 same manner as regular registration plates are validated under 17 this section . 18 Sec. 16. Section 321.37, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are 19 amended to read as follows: 20 1. Registration plates issued for a motor vehicle 21 other than an all-terrain vehicle, autocycle, motorcycle, 22 motorized bicycle, or truck tractor shall be attached to the 23 motor vehicle, one in the front and the other in the rear. 24 The registration plate issued for an all-terrain vehicle, 25 autocycle, motorcycle, or other vehicle required to be 26 registered under this chapter shall be attached to the rear of 27 the vehicle. The registration plate issued for a truck tractor 28 shall be attached to the front of the truck tractor. The 29 special plate issued to a dealer shall be attached on the rear 30 of the vehicle when operated on the highways of this state. 31 2. A motor vehicle, other than a truck registered for more 32 than five tons, all-terrain vehicle, autocycle, motorcycle, 33 or truck tractor, which is model year 1948 or older, and 34 a reconstructed or specially constructed vehicle built to 35 -7- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 7/ 33 H.F. _____ resemble a model year 1948 vehicle or older, may display one 1 registration plate on the rear of the vehicle if the other 2 registration plate issued to the vehicle is carried in the 3 vehicle at all times when the vehicle is operated on a public 4 highway. 5 Sec. 17. Section 321.69, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 9. Except for subsections 10 and 11 , this section does not 8 apply to motor trucks and truck tractors with a gross vehicle 9 weight rating of sixteen thousand pounds or more, vehicles more 10 than seven model years old, all-terrain vehicles, autocycles, 11 motorcycles, motorized bicycles, and special mobile equipment. 12 This section does apply to motor homes. The requirement in 13 subsection 1 that the new certificate of title and registration 14 receipt shall state on the face whether a prior owner had 15 disclosed that the vehicle was damaged to the extent that it 16 was a wrecked or salvage vehicle as defined in section 321.52, 17 subsection 4 , paragraph âeâ , does not apply to a vehicle 18 with a certificate of title bearing a designation that the 19 vehicle was previously titled on a salvage certificate of title 20 pursuant to section 321.52, subsection 4 , paragraph âcâ , or to 21 a vehicle with a certificate of title bearing a âREBUILTâ or 22 âSALVAGEâ designation pursuant to section 321.24, subsection 23 4 or 5 . Except for subsections 10 and 11 , this section does 24 not apply to new motor vehicles with a true mileage, as defined 25 in section 321.71 , of one thousand miles or less, unless such 26 vehicle has incurred damage as described in subsection 2 . 27 Sec. 18. Section 321.105A, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 28 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 29 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (32) An all-terrain vehicle that was 30 registered pursuant to section 321I.4 on or before July 1, 31 2026. 32 Sec. 19. Section 321.109, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 33 2026, is amended to read as follows: 34 a. The annual fee for all motor vehicles including vehicles 35 -8- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 8/ 33 H.F. _____ designated by manufacturers as station wagons, 1993 and 1 subsequent model year multipurpose vehicles, and 2010 and 2 subsequent model year motor trucks with an unladen weight of 3 ten thousand pounds or less, except motor trucks registered 4 under section 321.122 , business-trade trucks, special trucks, 5 motor homes, motorsports recreational vehicles, ambulances, 6 hearses, all-terrain vehicles, autocycles, motorcycles, 7 motorized bicycles, and 1992 and older model year multipurpose 8 vehicles, shall be equal to one percent of the value as 9 fixed by the department plus forty cents for each one hundred 10 pounds or fraction thereof of weight of vehicle, as fixed 11 by the department. The weight of a motor vehicle, fixed by 12 the department for registration purposes, shall include the 13 weight of a battery, heater, bumpers, spare tire, and wheel. 14 Provided, however, that for any new vehicle purchased in 15 this state by a nonresident for removal to the nonresidentâs 16 state of residence the purchaser may make application to 17 any county treasurer for a transit plate for which a fee 18 of ten dollars shall be paid. And provided, however, that 19 for any used vehicle held by a registered dealer and not 20 currently registered in this state, or for any vehicle held 21 by an individual and currently registered in this state, 22 when purchased in this state by a nonresident for removal 23 to the nonresidentâs state of residence, the purchaser may 24 make application to any county treasurer for a transit plate 25 for which a fee of three dollars shall be paid. The county 26 treasurer shall issue a nontransferable certificate of 27 registration for which no refund shall be allowed; and the 28 transit plates shall be void thirty days after issuance. Such 29 purchaser may apply for a certificate of title by surrendering 30 the manufacturerâs or importerâs certificate or certificate 31 of title, duly assigned as provided in this chapter . In this 32 event, the county treasurer shall, when satisfied with the 33 genuineness and regularity of the application, and upon payment 34 of a fee of thirty dollars, issue a certificate of title in the 35 -9- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 9/ 33 H.F. _____ name and address of the nonresident purchaser delivering the 1 title to the owner. If there is a security interest noted on 2 the title, the county treasurer shall mail to the secured party 3 an acknowledgment of the notation of the security interest. 4 The county treasurer shall not release a security interest that 5 has been noted on a title issued to a nonresident purchaser 6 as provided in this paragraph. The application requirements 7 of section 321.20 apply to a title issued as provided in this 8 subsection , except that a natural person who applies for a 9 certificate of title shall provide either the personâs social 10 security number, passport number, or driverâs license number, 11 whether the license was issued by this state, another state, or 12 another country. The provisions of this subsection relating to 13 multipurpose vehicles are effective for all 1993 and subsequent 14 model years. The annual registration fee for multipurpose 15 vehicles that are 1992 model years and older shall be in 16 accordance with section 321.124 . 17 Sec. 20. Section 321.109, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 18 amended to read as follows: 19 3. The owner of an unregistered motor vehicle or motor 20 vehicle for which the registration is delinquent may make 21 application to any county treasurer for a temporary thirty-day 22 permit for a fee of twenty-five dollars. The permit shall 23 authorize the motor vehicle to be driven or towed upon the 24 highway, but shall not authorize a motor truck or truck tractor 25 to haul or tow a load. The permit fee shall not be considered 26 a registration fee or exempt the owner from payment of all 27 other fees, registration fees, and penalties due. If the 28 annual registration fee for the motor vehicle is delinquent, 29 the annual registration fee and penalty shall continue to 30 accrue until paid. The permit fee shall not be prorated, 31 refunded, or used as credit as provided under section 321.46 . 32 The permit shall be displayed in the upper left-hand corner of 33 the rear window of all motor vehicles, except motorcycles and 34 all-terrain vehicles with no rear window . Permits issued for a 35 -10- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 10/ 33 H.F. _____ motorcycle or all-terrain vehicle with no rear window shall be 1 attached to the rear of the motorcycle or all-terrain vehicle, 2 as applicable . 3 Sec. 21. Section 321.117, Code 2026, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 321.117 Motorcycle, autocycle, all-terrain vehicle, 6 ambulance, and hearse registration fees. 7 1. a. For all motorcycles and autocycles the annual 8 registration fee shall be Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , 9 the annual registration fee for a motorcycle, autocycle, and 10 all-terrain vehicle is twenty dollars. For all 11 b. If a vehicle described in paragraph âaâ is more than five 12 model years old, the annual registration fee is ten dollars. 13 2. The annual registration fee for a motorized bicycles 14 the annual registration fee shall be bicycle is seven dollars. 15 When the motorcycle or autocycle is more than five model years 16 old, the annual registration fee shall be ten dollars. 17 3. The annual registration fee for ambulances an ambulance 18 and hearses shall be a hearse is fifty dollars. Passenger car 19 plates shall be issued for ambulances and hearses. 20 2. 4. In addition to the fee required for a motorcycle 21 and all-terrain vehicle under subsection 1 , the owner of a 22 motorcycle or all-terrain vehicle that is a battery electric 23 motor vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle, as 24 those terms are defined in section 321.116 , shall pay an annual 25 electric motorcycle or all-terrain vehicle registration fee. 26 The amount of the fee shall be is nine dollars. 27 Sec. 22. Section 321.145, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 28 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 29 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (04) An amount equal to fifteen 30 dollars for each all-terrain vehicle registration fee 31 collected pursuant to section 321.117 shall be credited to the 32 off-highway all-terrain vehicle recreational riding areas fund 33 created under section 321.146. 34 Sec. 23. NEW SECTION . 321.146 Off-highway all-terrain 35 -11- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 11/ 33 H.F. _____ vehicle recreational riding areas fund. 1 1. The off-highway all-terrain vehicle recreational riding 2 areas fund is created under the control of the department. 3 The fund shall consist of appropriations made to the fund and 4 transfers of interest, earnings, and moneys from other funds 5 as provided by law. The moneys credited to the fund are not 6 subject to section 8.33 and shall not be transferred, used, 7 obligated, appropriated, or otherwise encumbered except as 8 provided in this section. 9 2. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department 10 to award grants for the establishment, maintenance, and 11 operation of off-highway all-terrain vehicle recreational 12 riding areas. The department shall award such grants to 13 political subdivisions, incorporated private organizations, 14 or both. A grant awarded from the fund shall be used to 15 establish, maintain, or operate off-highway all-terrain vehicle 16 recreational riding areas. 17 3. Off-highway all-terrain vehicle recreational riding 18 areas established, maintained, or operated by the use of a 19 grant shall not be operated for profit. 20 4. The recipient of a grant shall establish and implement an 21 education instruction program either singly or in cooperation 22 with other grant recipients. Grants may be used to support 23 recipientsâ programs on a usage basis. The department may 24 establish and implement an education instruction program using 25 unawarded moneys in the fund. 26 5. Moneys awarded from the fund shall not be used for 27 law enforcement purposes outside of a designated off-highway 28 all-terrain vehicle recreational riding area or for purchasing, 29 installing, or maintaining signs along a highway outside of a 30 designated off-highway all-terrain vehicle recreational riding 31 area. 32 Sec. 24. Section 321.166, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 33 2026, is amended to read as follows: 34 a. Registration plates shall be of metal and of a size not 35 -12- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 12/ 33 H.F. _____ to exceed six inches by twelve inches, except that the size 1 of plates issued for use on all-terrain vehicles, autocycles, 2 motorized bicycles, motorcycles, motorcycle trailers, and 3 trailers with an empty weight of two thousand pounds or less 4 shall be established by the department. 5 Sec. 25. Section 321.166, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2026, 6 are amended to read as follows: 7 3. The registration plate number shall be displayed in 8 characters which shall not exceed a height of four inches nor a 9 stroke width exceeding five-eighths of an inch. Special plates 10 issued to dealers shall display the alphabetical character 11 âDâ, which shall be of the same size as the characters in the 12 registration plate. The registration plate number issued 13 for all-terrain vehicles, autocycles, motorized bicycles, 14 motorcycles, trailers with an empty weight of two thousand 15 pounds or less, and motorcycle trailers shall be a size 16 prescribed by the department. 17 4. The registration plate number, except on all-terrain 18 vehicles, autocycles, motorized bicycles, motorcycles, 19 motorcycle trailers, and trailers with an empty weight of two 20 thousand pounds or less, shall be of sufficient size to be 21 readable from a distance of one hundred feet during daylight. 22 Sec. 26. Section 321.178, subsection 1, paragraph a, 23 subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 (4) Instruction providing an awareness about sharing the 25 road with pedestrians, bicycles, all-terrain vehicles, and 26 motorcycles. The instruction course shall be first approved 27 by the state department of transportation. Instructional 28 materials creating an awareness about sharing the road with 29 pedestrians, bicycles, all-terrain vehicles, and motorcycles 30 shall also be distributed during the course of instruction. 31 Sec. 27. Section 321.178A, subsection 3, paragraph a, 32 subparagraph (5), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 33 (5) Instruction providing an awareness about sharing the 34 road with pedestrians, bicycles, all-terrain vehicles, and 35 -13- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 13/ 33 H.F. _____ motorcycles. 1 Sec. 28. Section 321.234A, subsection 1, unnumbered 2 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3 All-terrain vehicles A person shall not be operated operate 4 an unregistered all-terrain vehicle on a highway unless one or 5 more of the following conditions apply: 6 Sec. 29. Section 321.234A, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. The operation is between sunrise and sunset and is 9 incidental to the vehicleâs use for agricultural purposes. For 10 purposes of this paragraph, âincidental to the vehicleâs use 11 for agricultural purposesâ includes stopping in the course of 12 agricultural use to obtain fuel for the all-terrain vehicle or 13 to obtain food or a nonalcoholic beverage for the operator. 14 Sec. 30. Section 321.234A, subsection 1, paragraph f, Code 15 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 16 Sec. 31. Section 321.234A, Code 2026, is amended by adding 17 the following new subsection: 18 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. Except as provided in this subsection, 19 a person shall not operate an all-terrain vehicle registered 20 under this chapter on a highway. 21 a. A person may operate a registered all-terrain vehicle 22 on an undivided two-lane primary highway that is not part of 23 the interstate road system and on a paved, undivided two-lane 24 secondary road over the most direct and accessible route 25 between any of the following locations: 26 (1) An all-terrain vehicle park or trail. 27 (2) A secondary road on which such vehicles are authorized 28 to operate under paragraph âbâ . 29 (3) A city street on which such vehicles are authorized to 30 operate under paragraph âdâ . 31 (4) The vehicle operatorâs residence. 32 b. (1) A person may operate a registered all-terrain 33 vehicle on any of the following secondary roads: 34 (a) An unpaved secondary road. 35 -14- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 14/ 33 H.F. _____ (b) A paved, undivided secondary road or segment thereof, 1 if authorized by the county board of supervisors. The board 2 shall evaluate the traffic conditions on all such secondary 3 roads under its jurisdiction and designate roadways on which 4 all-terrain vehicles may be operated without unduly interfering 5 with or constituting an undue hazard to conventional motor 6 vehicle traffic. In designating such roadways, the board may 7 authorize all-terrain vehicles to stop at service stations or 8 convenience stores along a designated roadway. 9 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), a county may prohibit 10 the operation of all-terrain vehicles on a secondary road or 11 segment thereof under its jurisdiction as follows: 12 (a) When the secondary road or segment thereof is closed to 13 motor vehicle traffic pursuant to section 306.41. 14 (b) When the secondary road or segment thereof is 15 designated as a detour route pursuant to section 306.41. 16 (c) For any other secondary road or segment thereof, for no 17 more than seven consecutive days and no more than thirty days 18 in a calendar year when the prohibited days are established by 19 ordinance. 20 c. On state park road systems, including anywhere within 21 the boundaries of a state park that any other motor vehicle 22 required to be registered under this chapter is authorized to 23 operate. 24 d. On a municipal street system if authorized by the 25 city. A city may designate streets under the jurisdiction of 26 the city within its corporate limits, and two-lane primary 27 and secondary road extensions in the city, which may be used 28 for the operation of all-terrain vehicles. In designating 29 such streets, the city may authorize all-terrain vehicles 30 to stop at service stations or convenience stores along a 31 designated street. A city shall not charge a fee to operate an 32 all-terrain vehicle within the city. 33 Sec. 32. Section 321.234A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 34 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 35 -15- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 15/ 33 H.F. _____ thereof the following: 1 2. A person shall not operate an all-terrain vehicle on 2 a highway in excess of thirty-five miles per hour. A person 3 under the age of eighteen years old shall not operate an 4 all-terrain vehicle on a highway unless the person is operating 5 pursuant to subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . 6 Sec. 33. Section 321.234A, subsections 3, 4, and 5, Code 7 2026, are amended to read as follows: 8 3. As provided in section 321.1 , an all-terrain vehicle is 9 a motor vehicle for purposes of this chapter . Therefore, an 10 all-terrain vehicle operated on a highway shall be equipped 11 with the parts, lamps, and other equipment in proper condition 12 and adjustment as required under this chapter for motor 13 vehicles , including but not limited to the parts, lamps, and 14 equipment required under sections 321.386 , 321.387 , 321.404 , 15 321.432 , and 321.437 . 16 4. An all-terrain vehicle that is owned by the owner of 17 land adjacent to a highway, other than an interstate road, may 18 be operated by the owner of the all-terrain vehicle, or by a 19 member of the ownerâs family, on the portion of the highway 20 right-of-way that is between the shoulder of the roadway, 21 or at least five feet from the edge of the roadway, and the 22 ownerâs property line. A person operating an all-terrain 23 vehicle within the highway right-of-way under this subsection 24 shall comply with the registration, age and safety , and age 25 requirements under chapter 321I . 26 5. a. A Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , a person 27 convicted of a violation of who violates this section is guilty 28 of commits a simple misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled 29 violation under section 805.8A, subsection 3 . 30 b. A person who operates an unregistered all-terrain vehicle 31 other than as authorized in subsection 1 shall be charged with 32 a violation of section 321.17. 33 Sec. 34. Section 321.317, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 34 amended to read as follows: 35 -16- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 16/ 33 H.F. _____ 3. It is unlawful for any A person to shall not sell or 1 offer for sale or operate on the highways of the state any 2 vehicle subject to registration under the provisions of this 3 chapter which has never been registered in this or any other 4 state prior to January 1, 1954, unless the vehicle is equipped 5 with a directional signal device of a type in compliance with 6 the provisions of subsection 2 . Motorcycles All-terrain 7 vehicles equipped with a seat or saddle designed to be 8 straddled by the operator and handlebars for steering control, 9 motorcycles , motorized bicycles, and semitrailers and trailers 10 less than forty inches in width are exempt from the provisions 11 of this section subsection . 12 Sec. 35. Section 321.404A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 1. A person shall not operate a motor vehicle , motorcycle, 15 or motorized bicycle on the highways of this state a highway if 16 it is equipped with a device that restricts the light output of 17 a headlamp required under section 321.385 or 321.386 , a rear 18 lamp required under section 321.387 , a signal lamp or signal 19 device required under section 321.404 , or a directional signal 20 device as described in section 321.317 . 21 Sec. 36. Section 321.438, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 22 amended to read as follows: 23 3. Every motor vehicle except an all-terrain vehicle 24 equipped with a seat or saddle designed to be straddled by the 25 operator and handlebars for steering control, a motorcycle, 26 or a vehicle included in the provisions of section 321.383 27 or section 321.115 shall be equipped with a windshield in 28 accordance with section 321.444 . 29 Sec. 37. Section 321.445, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 30 amended to read as follows: 31 1. Except for all-terrain vehicles equipped with a seat or 32 saddle designed to be straddled by the operator and handlebars 33 for steering control, motorcycles or , and motorized bicycles, 34 1966 model year or newer motor vehicles subject to registration 35 -17- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 17/ 33 H.F. _____ in Iowa shall be equipped with safety belts and safety 1 harnesses which conform with federal motor vehicle safety 2 standard numbers 209 and 210 as published in 49 C.F.R. Â§571.209 3 â 571.210 and with prior federal motor vehicle safety standards 4 for seat belt assemblies and seat belt assembly anchorages 5 applicable for the motor vehicleâs model year. 6 Sec. 38. Section 321.445, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. The driver and front seat occupants of a type of motor 9 vehicle that is subject to registration in Iowa, except a an 10 all-terrain vehicle equipped with a seat or saddle designed 11 to be straddled by the operator and handlebars for steering 12 control, motorcycle , or a motorized bicycle, shall each wear a 13 properly adjusted and fastened safety belt or safety harness 14 any time the vehicle is in forward motion on a street or 15 highway in this state except that a child under eighteen years 16 of age shall be secured as required under section 321.446 . 17 Sec. 39. Section 321I.1, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 18 2026, is amended to read as follows: 19 b. Off-road motorcycles shall be considered all-terrain 20 vehicles for the purpose of registration this chapter . 21 Off-road motorcycles shall also be considered all-terrain 22 vehicles for the purpose of titling if a title has not 23 previously been issued pursuant to chapter 321 . An operator 24 of an off-road motorcycle is subject to provisions governing 25 the operation of all-terrain vehicles in this chapter , but is 26 exempt from the education instruction and certification program 27 requirements of sections 321I.25 and 321I.26 . 28 Sec. 40. Section 321I.1, subsections 4, 13, and 23, Code 29 2026, are amended to read as follows: 30 4. âDealerâ means a person engaged in the business of 31 buying, selling, or exchanging all-terrain vehicles required 32 to be registered under this chapter and who has an established 33 place of business for that purpose in this state. 34 13. âManufacturerâ means a person engaged in the business of 35 -18- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 18/ 33 H.F. _____ constructing or assembling all-terrain vehicles required to be 1 registered under this chapter and who has an established place 2 of business for that purpose in this state. 3 23. âPublic landâ means land owned by the federal 4 government, the state, or political subdivisions of the state 5 and land acquired or developed for public recreation pursuant 6 to section 321.146 or section 321I.8 , Code 2026 . 7 Sec. 41. Section 321I.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 8 following new subsection: 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 12A. âHighwayâ means the entire width 10 between property lines of every way or place of whatever nature 11 when any part thereof is open to the use of the public, as a 12 matter of right, for purposes of vehicular travel, except in 13 public areas in which the boundary shall be thirty-three feet 14 each side of the center line of the roadway. 15 Sec. 42. Section 321I.1, subsection 17, paragraph b, Code 16 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 b. The operator of an off-road utility vehicle is subject 18 to provisions governing the operation of all-terrain vehicles 19 in section 321.234A , this chapter , and administrative rules, 20 but is exempt from the education instruction and certification 21 program requirements of sections 321I.25 and 321I.26 . An 22 operator of an off-road utility vehicle shall not operate 23 the vehicle on a designated riding area or designated riding 24 trail unless the department has posted signage indicating the 25 riding area or trail is open to the operation of off-road 26 utility vehicles. Off-road utility vehicles are subject to the 27 dealer registration and titling requirements of this chapter . 28 A motorized motor vehicle that was previously titled or is 29 currently titled under chapter 321 as a vehicle other than as 30 an off-road utility vehicle shall not be registered or operated 31 as an off-road utility vehicle. 32 Sec. 43. Section 321I.1, subsection 29, Code 2026, is 33 amended by striking the subsection. 34 Sec. 44. Section 321I.2, subsection 1, paragraphs a, e, and 35 -19- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 19/ 33 H.F. _____ h, Code 2026, are amended by striking the paragraphs. 1 Sec. 45. Section 321I.10, subsections 1, 2, 3, 4, and 5, 2 Code 2026, are amended by striking the subsections. 3 Sec. 46. Section 321I.10, subsection 7, paragraph e, Code 4 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 e. The crossing is made from a street, roadway, or highway 6 on which the all-terrain vehicle or off-road utility vehicle is 7 authorized to operate public land, public ice, or a designated 8 riding trail in this state to a street, roadway, or highway on 9 which such vehicle is authorized to operate public land, public 10 ice, or a designated riding trail in this state . 11 Sec. 47. Section 321I.15A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 12 amended to read as follows: 13 1. a. The court may assess the defendant a civil penalty 14 of two hundred fifty dollars. The civil penalty shall be 15 deposited in the special off-highway all-terrain vehicle 16 recreational riding areas fund created pursuant to under 17 section 321I.8 321.146 . 18 b. The court may order the defendant to pay restitution to 19 the titleholder of land for damages caused by the defendantâs 20 violation, to the extent that the titleholder consents 21 to joining the action, and the titleholderâs damages are 22 established at trial. If the titleholder is the state, the 23 amount of restitution ordered to be paid by the court shall 24 be deposited in the special off-highway all-terrain vehicle 25 recreational riding areas fund created pursuant to under 26 section 321I.8 321.146 . If the titleholder is a governmental 27 entity other than the state, the moneys shall be paid to 28 the governmental entity for deposit in any fund or account 29 from which moneys are used for the maintenance, repair, or 30 improvement of the land where the damage occurred. 31 Sec. 48. Section 321I.17, Code 2026, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 321I.17 Special events. 34 The department may authorize the holding of organized 35 -20- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 20/ 33 H.F. _____ special events as defined in this chapter within this state. 1 The department shall adopt rules relating to the conduct of 2 special events held under department permits and designating 3 the equipment and facilities necessary for the safe operation 4 of all-terrain vehicles, off-road motorcycles, and off-road 5 utility vehicles and for the safety of operators, participants, 6 and observers in the special events. A special event may 7 require an entrance fee set by the organizer of the special 8 event. The department may require that part of the entrance 9 fee be credited to pay costs of all-terrain vehicle programs 10 authorized pursuant to section 321I.8 the off-highway 11 all-terrain vehicle recreational riding areas fund created 12 under section 321.146 . At least thirty days before the 13 scheduled date of a special event in this state, an application 14 shall be filed with the department for authorization to conduct 15 the special event. The application shall set forth the date, 16 time, and location of the proposed special event and any 17 other information the department requires. The special event 18 shall not be conducted without written authorization of the 19 department. 20 Sec. 49. Section 321I.20, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 21 amended to read as follows: 22 1. The owner of a rented all-terrain vehicle shall keep 23 a record of the name and address of each person renting 24 the all-terrain vehicle, its registration certificate, the 25 departure date and time, and the expected time of return. The 26 records shall be preserved for six months. 27 Sec. 50. Section 321I.22, subsections 1, 7, and 8, Code 28 2026, are amended by striking the subsections. 29 Sec. 51. Section 321I.22, subsections 2, 3, and 4, Code 30 2026, are amended to read as follows: 31 2. Every manufacturer, distributor, or dealer shall 32 register with the department by making application to the 33 commission, upon forms prescribed by the commission, for a 34 special registration certificate and decal . The applicant 35 -21- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 21/ 33 H.F. _____ shall pay a registration fee of forty-five dollars and submit 1 reasonable proof of the applicantâs status as a bona fide 2 manufacturer, distributor, or dealer as may be required by the 3 commission. 4 3. The commission, upon granting an application, shall 5 issue to the applicant a special registration certificate and 6 decal . The special registration certificate shall contain the 7 applicantâs name, address, and general identification number; 8 the word âmanufacturerâ, âdealerâ, or âdistributorâ; and other 9 information the commission prescribes. 10 4. The commission shall also issue duplicate special 11 registration certificates and decals which shall have displayed 12 thereon the general identification number assigned to the 13 applicant. A county recorder may issue duplicate special 14 registration certificates and decals electronically pursuant to 15 rules adopted by the commission. The fee for each additional 16 duplicate special registration certificate and decal shall be 17 is five dollars plus a writing fee. 18 Sec. 52. Section 321I.26, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 19 amended to read as follows: 20 4. The certificate fees collected under this section shall 21 be credited to the special all-terrain vehicle off-highway 22 all-terrain vehicle recreational riding areas fund and shall be 23 used for educational programs created under section 321.146 . 24 Sec. 53. Section 321I.27, Code 2026, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 321I.27 Stopping and inspecting ââ warnings. 27 A peace officer may stop and inspect an all-terrain vehicle 28 operated, parked, or stored on public streets, highways, public 29 lands, public ice, or designated riding trails of the state to 30 determine if the all-terrain vehicle is registered, numbered, 31 or equipped as required by this chapter and commission rules. 32 The officer shall not inspect an area that is not essential to 33 determine compliance with the requirements. If the officer 34 determines that the all-terrain vehicle is not in compliance, 35 -22- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 22/ 33 H.F. _____ the officer may issue a warning memorandum to the operator and 1 forward a copy to the commission. The warning memorandum shall 2 must indicate the items found not in compliance and shall must 3 direct the owner or operator of the all-terrain vehicle to 4 have the all-terrain vehicle in compliance and return a copy 5 of the warning memorandum with the proof of compliance to the 6 commission within fourteen days. If the proof of compliance 7 is not provided within fourteen days, the owner or operator is 8 in violation of this chapter . 9 Sec. 54. Section 321I.28, Code 2026, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 321I.28 Termination of use. 12 A person who receives a warning memorandum for an 13 all-terrain vehicle shall stop using the all-terrain vehicle as 14 soon as possible and shall not operate it on public streets, 15 highways, public lands, public ice, or designated riding trails 16 of the state until the all-terrain vehicle is in compliance. 17 Sec. 55. Section 321I.29, Code 2026, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 321I.29 Writing fees. 20 1. a. The county recorder shall collect a writing fee of 21 two dollars for each privilege under this chapter . 22 b. 2. Writing fees collected or retained by the county 23 recorder under this chapter shall be deposited in the general 24 fund of the county. 25 2. a. A license agent shall collect a writing fee of one 26 dollar for an all-terrain vehicle registration or for renewal 27 of a registration issued by the license agent. 28 b. A license agent shall retain a writing fee of one dollar 29 from the sale of each user permit issued by the license agent. 30 Sec. 56. Section 321I.30, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 31 amended to read as follows: 32 1. This chapter and other applicable laws of this state 33 shall govern the operation, equipment, numbering, and all other 34 matters relating to an all-terrain vehicle when the all-terrain 35 -23- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 23/ 33 H.F. _____ vehicle is operated or maintained on public land, public ice, 1 or a designated riding trail in this state. However, this 2 chapter does not prevent the adoption of an ordinance or local 3 law relating to the operation or equipment of all-terrain 4 vehicles on public land, public ice, or a designated riding 5 trail . The ordinances or local laws are operative only so long 6 as they are not inconsistent with this chapter or the rules 7 adopted by the commission. 8 Sec. 57. Section 321I.31, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 9 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 10 thereof the following: 11 1. A person who owns an all-terrain vehicle or off-road 12 utility vehicle that is not required to be registered under 13 chapter 321 may apply for and receive a certificate of title 14 for the all-terrain vehicle or off-road utility vehicle, as 15 applicable. 16 Sec. 58. Section 321I.31, subsection 9, Code 2026, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 9. If the county recorder is not satisfied as to the 19 ownership of the all-terrain vehicle or that there are no 20 undisclosed security interests in the all-terrain vehicle, 21 the county recorder may issue a certificate of title for the 22 all-terrain vehicle but, as a condition of such issuance, 23 may require the applicant to file with the department a bond 24 in the form prescribed by the department and executed by the 25 applicant, and also executed by a person authorized to conduct 26 a surety business in this state. The form and amount of the 27 bond shall be established by rule of the department. The bond 28 shall be conditioned to indemnify any prior owner and secured 29 party and any subsequent purchaser of the all-terrain vehicle 30 or person acquiring any security interest in the all-terrain 31 vehicle, and their respective successors in interest, against 32 any expense, loss, or damage, including reasonable attorney 33 fees, by reason of the issuance of the certificate of title 34 of the all-terrain vehicle or on account of any defect in 35 -24- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 24/ 33 H.F. _____ or undisclosed security interest upon the right, title, and 1 interest of the applicant in and to the all-terrain vehicle. 2 Any such interested person has a right of action to recover on 3 the bond for any breach of its conditions, but the aggregate 4 liability of the surety to all persons shall not exceed the 5 amount of the bond. The bond shall be returned at the end of 6 three years or prior thereto if the all-terrain vehicle is no 7 longer registered in this state and the certificate of title is 8 surrendered to the department, unless the department has been 9 notified of the pendency of an action to recover on the bond. 10 Sec. 59. Section 321I.32, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 11 amended to read as follows: 12 5. Five dollars of the certificate of title fees collected 13 under this section shall be remitted by the county recorder to 14 the treasurer of state for deposit in the special off-highway 15 all-terrain vehicle recreational riding areas fund created 16 under section 321I.8 321.146 . The remaining five dollars shall 17 be retained by the county and deposited into the general fund 18 of the county. 19 Sec. 60. Section 321I.34, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 20 2026, is amended to read as follows: 21 b. The application fee for a security interest is ten 22 dollars. Five dollars of the fee shall be credited to the 23 special off-highway all-terrain vehicle recreational riding 24 areas fund created under section 321I.8 321.146 . The remaining 25 five dollars shall be retained by the county and deposited into 26 the general fund of the county. 27 Sec. 61. Section 321I.35, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 28 amended to read as follows: 29 1. The department may assign a distinguishing number to an 30 all-terrain vehicle when the serial number on the all-terrain 31 vehicle is destroyed or obliterated and issue to the owner a 32 special decal bearing the distinguishing number which shall 33 be affixed to the all-terrain vehicle in a position to be 34 determined by the department. The If the owner applies for 35 -25- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 25/ 33 H.F. _____ a certificate of title under this chapter, the all-terrain 1 vehicle shall be registered and titled under the distinguishing 2 number in lieu of the former serial number. Every all-terrain 3 vehicle shall have a vehicle identification number assigned and 4 affixed as required by the department. 5 Sec. 62. Section 321I.36, subsections 2, 3, 4, and 5, Code 6 2026, are amended to read as follows: 7 2. A person who pleads guilty to or is convicted of 8 a violation of any provision of this chapter while the 9 personâs registration privilege is suspended or revoked under 10 administrative procedures is guilty of a simple misdemeanor if 11 the person had no other violations within the previous three 12 years which occurred while the personâs registration privilege 13 was suspended or revoked . 14 3. A person who pleads guilty to or is convicted of 15 a violation of any provision of this chapter while the 16 personâs registration privilege is suspended or revoked under 17 administrative procedures is guilty of a serious misdemeanor if 18 the person had one other violation within the previous three 19 years which occurred while the personâs registration privilege 20 was suspended or revoked . 21 4. A person who pleads guilty to or is convicted of 22 a violation of any provision of this chapter while the 23 personâs registration privilege is suspended or revoked 24 under administrative procedures is guilty of an aggravated 25 misdemeanor if the person had two or more convictions within 26 the previous three years which occurred while the personâs 27 registration privilege was suspended or revoked . 28 5. a. Upon the conviction of a person of any violation of 29 this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter , the court, 30 as a part of the judgment, may suspend or revoke one or more 31 all-terrain vehicle registration or user permit privileges of 32 the person for any definite period. 33 b. The court shall revoke all of the personâs all-terrain 34 vehicle registrations or user permits and suspend the privilege 35 -26- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 26/ 33 H.F. _____ of procuring a registration or user permit for a period of one 1 year for any person who has been convicted twice within one 2 year of trespassing while operating an all-terrain vehicle. A 3 person shall not be issued a registration or user permit during 4 the period of suspension or revocation. 5 Sec. 63. Section 331.362, subsection 9, Code 2026, is 6 amended to read as follows: 7 9. A county may regulate traffic on and use of the secondary 8 roads, in accordance with sections 321.234A, 321.236 through 9 321.239, 321.241 , 321.247 through 321.250 , 321.254 , 321.255 , 10 321.285, subsection 4 , sections 321.352 , 321.471 through 11 321.473 , and other applicable provisions of chapter 321 , 12 chapter 321E , and sections 321G.9 , 321I.10 , and 327G.15 . 13 Sec. 64. Section 331.427, subsection 1, unnumbered 14 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15 Except as otherwise provided by state law, county revenues 16 from taxes and other sources for general county services shall 17 be credited to the general fund of the county, including 18 revenues received under sections 9I.11 , 101A.3 , 101A.7 , 19 123.36 , 142D.9 , 176A.8 , 321.105 , 321.152 , 321G.7 , 321I.8 , 20 section 331.554, subsection 6 , sections 341A.20 , 364.3 , 368.21 , 21 423A.7 , 428A.8 , 434.19 , 445.57 , 453A.35 , 458A.21 , 483A.12 , 22 533.329 , 556B.1 , 583.6 , 602.8108 , 904.908 , and 906.17 , and the 23 following: 24 Sec. 65. Section 331.602, subsection 16, Code 2026, is 25 amended to read as follows: 26 16. Issue snowmobile and all-terrain vehicle registrations 27 and user permits as provided in sections 321G.4 , 321G.4B , 28 321G.6 , and 321G.21 , 321I.4 , 321I.5 , 321I.7 , and 321I.22 . 29 Sec. 66. Section 331.605, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 30 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 31 Sec. 67. Section 331.610, Code 2026, is amended to read as 32 follows: 33 331.610 Abolition of office of recorder ââ identification of 34 office ââ place of filing. 35 -27- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 27/ 33 H.F. _____ If the office of county recorder is abolished in a county, 1 the auditor of that county shall be referred to as the county 2 auditor and recorder. After abolition of the office of county 3 recorder, references in the Code requiring filing or recording 4 of documents with the county recorder shall be deemed to 5 require the filing in the office of the county auditor and 6 recorder, and all duties of the abolished office of recorder 7 shall be performed by the county auditor and recorder. 8 However, the board of supervisors may direct that any of 9 the duties of the abolished office of recorder prescribed 10 in section 331.602, subsection 9, 10, 11, or 16 , or section 11 331.605, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ , âbâ , âcâ , or âdâ , or âeâ , 12 shall be performed by other county officers or employees as 13 provided in section 331.323 . 14 Sec. 68. Section 462A.33, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to automobiles, all-terrain 17 vehicles, motorcycles, or trucks registered under chapter 321 ; , 18 or snowmobiles registered under chapter 321G ; or all-terrain 19 vehicles, off-road motorcycles, or off-road utility vehicles 20 registered under chapter 321I , when any of those vehicles are 21 used without endangering public safety. 22 Sec. 69. Section 805.8B, subsection 2A, paragraphs a and e, 23 Code 2026, are amended by striking the paragraphs. 24 Sec. 70. Section 805.8B, subsection 2A, paragraph b, 25 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 26 (2) For operating violations under section 321I.10, 27 subsections 1 and subsection 6, the scheduled fine is seventy 28 dollars. 29 Sec. 71. REPEAL. Sections 321I.3, 321I.4, 321I.5, 321I.6, 30 321I.7, 321I.8, 321I.9, and 321I.16, Code 2026, are repealed. 31 Sec. 72. SPECIAL ALL-TERRAIN VEHICLE FUND ââ TRANSFER. Any 32 unencumbered and unobligated moneys in the special all-terrain 33 vehicle fund created in section 321I.8, Code 2026, are 34 transferred to the off-highway all-terrain vehicle recreational 35 -28- LSB 5876YC (6) 91 th/ns 28/ 33 H.F. _____ riding areas fund created under section 321.146, as enacted 1 by this division of this Act, on the effective date of this 2 division of this Act. 3 DIVISION II 4 REQUIRED INFORMATION FOR SNOWMOBILE AND VESSEL REGISTRATIONS 5 Sec. 73. Section 321G.4, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 1. The owner of each snowmobile required to be registered 8 shall register it annually with the department through a 9 county recorder. The department shall develop and maintain an 10 electronic system for the registration of snowmobiles pursuant 11 to this chapter . The department shall establish forms and 12 procedures as necessary for the registration of snowmobiles. A 13 person shall not be required to provide the personâs height, 14 weight, or eye color when completing a form. 15 Sec. 74. Section 462A.5, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 16 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 The owner of each vessel required to be numbered by this 18 state shall initially register it with the commission through 19 the county recorder of the county in which the owner resides, 20 or, if the owner is a nonresident, the owner shall register 21 it in the county in which such vessel is principally used. 22 Both residents and nonresidents shall subsequently renew 23 registration every three years with any county recorder. The 24 commission shall develop and maintain an electronic system for 25 the registration of vessels pursuant to this chapter . The 26 commission shall establish forms and procedures as necessary 27 for the registration of all vessels. A person shall not be 28 required to provide the personâs height, weight, or eye color 29 when completing a form. 30